Washington statutes.
RCW 18.50.045

Midwifery education programs—Accreditation.

The secretary shall promulgate standards by rule under chapter 34.05 RCW for accrediting midwifery educational programs. The standards shall cover the provision of adequate clinical and didactic instruction in all subjects and noncurriculum matters under this section including, but not limited to, staffing and teacher qualifications. In developing the standards, the secretary shall be advised by and receive the recommendations of the midwifery advisory committee.

[ 1991 c 3 s 107; 1981 c 53 s 7.]